Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.383

Patches pal license plates.

(1) "Patches pal license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the likenesses of the J.P. Patches and Gertrude characters from the J.P. Patches show, or children's characters that are changed in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2031, and each decade thereafter, the Seattle children's hospital may consult with the department regarding the design of the Patches pal license plate to determine whether the current design is the best design to support the Seattle children's hospital strong against cancer program in the following 10-year time period. Following this consultation, if Seattle children's hospital determines that another group of appropriate children's characters would better support the program due to public interest at the time, Seattle children's hospital may request a redesign of the Patches pal license plate with these new characters and a new corresponding plate name. The costs associated with this consultation and redesign may be paid from the proceeds from the special license plate sales or else shall be covered by Seattle children's hospital as the sponsoring organization.

[ 2022 c 239 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 239: See note following RCW 46.17.220.